Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10C-117.5] Additional civil
liability. An insurer whose insured causes death or injury to another
person, and that is not entitled to the reduction provided in section
431:10C-301.5, shall be entitled to recover the amount of the covered loss deductible
that would have applied from the insured whose conduct resulted in
inapplicability of the covered loss deductible. [L 2000, c 70, §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next